California, session 20252026, AB100.
do enact as follows: SECTION 1. Item 5227-122-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2023 is amended to read: 5227-122-0001—For local assistance, Board of State and Community Corrections ........................ 16,000,000 Schedule: (1) 4945-Corrections Planning and Grant Programs ........................ 16,000,000 Provisions: 1. These funds shall be awarded by the Board of State and Community Corrections as competitive grants to federally recognized Indian tribes in California to support efforts to identify, collect case-level data, publicize, and investigate and solve cases involving missing and murdered indigenous people. The board shall consult with and include stakeholders from the indigenous community to inform the grant outreach process and the process to select and administer grants. 2. Grants should focus on activities including, but not limited to, developing culturally based prevention strategies, strengthening responses to human trafficking, and improving cooperation and communication on jurisdictional issues between state, local, federal, and tribal law enforcement in order to investigate and solve cases involving missing and murdered indigenous people. Allowable expenditures may include reimbursement to eligible tribes for contracted services with local law enforcement agencies for staffing in support of eligible grant activities. 3. Of the amount identified in this item, up to 5 percent shall be available to the Board of State and Community Corrections for transfer to Schedule (1) of Item 5227-001-0001 for costs to administer the grant programs. Funds transferred pursuant to this provision are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 4. Funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. 5. The Board of State and Community Corrections shall provide an initial report to the Legislature by December 1, 2023, an interim report by December 31, 2028, and a final report by December 31, 2029, that includes, but is not limited to, information about the grant recipients, the allocation of funds, and applicable metrics and outcomes of the program. SEC. 2. Item 7502-495 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2023 is amended to read: 7502-495—Reversion, Department of Technology. The balances specified below of the appropriation provided in the following citation shall revert to the balance of the fund from which the appropriation was made. 0001—General Fund (1) Item 7502-002-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). Up to $38,500,000 appropriated in Program 6230—Department of Technology. SEC. 3. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2023 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2023 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 12 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 101). (b) Chapter 38 of the Statutes of 2023 (Assembly Bill No. 102). (c) Chapter 189 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 104). (d) Chapter 862 of the Statutes of 2023 (Senate Bill No. 105). (e) Chapter 9 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 106). (f) Chapter 36 of the Statutes of 2024 (Senate Bill No. 109). (g) Chapter 996 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 158). SEC. 4. Item 0555-492 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 0555-492—Reappropriation, Secretary for Environmental Protection. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2026: 0001—General Fund (1) Item 0555-101-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021) SEC. 5. Item 0690-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 0690-001-0001—For support of Office of Emergency Services ........................ 278,119,000 Schedule: (1) 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ 177,170,000 (2) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 113,653,000 (3) 0390-Alfred E. Alquist Seismic Safety Commission ........................ 351,000 (4) 0395-Public Safety Communications ........................ 325,000 (5) 9900100-Administration ........................ 49,213,000 (6) 9900200-Administration—​Distributed ........................ −49,213,000 (7) Reimbursements to 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ −5,510,000 (8) Reimbursements to 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ −7,870,000 Provisions: 1. Funds appropriated in this item may be reduced by the Director of Finance, after giving notice to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, by the amount of federal funds made available for the purposes of this item in excess of the federal funds scheduled in Item 0690-001-0890. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $6,700,000 shall be for the Office of Emergency Services to reimburse local law enforcement agencies to offset the cost to local law enforcement agencies of reimbursing qualified health care professionals, hospitals, or other emergency medical facilities for medical evidentiary examinations for all sexual assault victims in accordance with Section 13823.95 of the Penal Code. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $7,650,000 shall be available to fund an operational observer from February 1, 2025, to June 30, 2026. By no later than July 1, 2025, the Office of Emergency Services shall report to the Legislature on the operational observer’s work. This report shall include for all electrical corporations in the scope of this work: (1) activities undertaken, (2) specific issues identified in the wildfire risk reduction processes of covered utilities, (3) qualitative and quantitative information on improvements to the wildfire risk reduction processes of the covered utilities resulting from these actions, (4) handling and coordination of new business requests across its service territory, and (5) all work planning and execution process related to new business requests and wildfire risk. The office shall update the report no later than June 30, 2026. 4. Notwithstanding any other law, the Director of Emergency Services is authorized to contract with an operational observer to monitor covered utilities’ implementation of measures to mitigate the risk of wildfire ignitions from utility infrastructure and reduce the use, scope, and duration of public safety power shutoffs. The resulting contract or contracts for services shall not require the review, consent, or approval of the Department of General Services or any other state department or agency and need not comply with requirements under the State Contracting Manual, the Public Contract Code, and the personal services contracting requirements of Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code. The contract or contracts for services may include those terms and conditions that the Director of Emergency Services finds to be in the state’s best interest. SEC. 6. Item 0690-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 0690-101-0001—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services ........................ 108,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0380-Emergency Management Services ........................ 61,204,000 (2) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 46,796,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Office of Emergency Services may provide advance payment of up to 25 percent of grant funds awarded to community-based, nonprofit organizations, cities, school districts, counties, and other units of local government that have demonstrated cashflow problems according to the criteria set forth by the Office of Emergency Services. 2. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $17,000,000 shall be used for grants related to services for victims of human trafficking. 3. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $25,000,000 is available to support activities directly related to regional response and readiness. These activities include, but are not limited to, predeployment of the Office of Emergency Services’ fire and rescue and local government resources that are part of the California Fire and Rescue Mutual Aid System or additional resources upon the authority and approval of the Office of Emergency Services to meet the requirements for state resources called up for predisaster and disaster response. Prepositioning shall be based upon predesignated criteria and a predicted scale of the emergency event and shall be consistent with this state’s current procedures under the mutual aid system. 4. No later than February 1 of each year, the Office of Emergency Services shall report to the appropriate budget subcommittees of the Legislature, the Assembly Committee on Governmental Organization, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on the requests approved for prepositioning resources made by local agencies in the previous fiscal year. The information provided shall be organized by mutual aid region and shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following for each request for prepositioning resources: (a) The entity or operational area that requested resources; type of prepositioning event; risk factors (criteria) prompting the request, including a summary of red flag events; description of the resources requested; location where resources were placed; the start date and time and the end date and time of prepositioned resources; and the reimbursement amount associated with the response. (b) An assessment, with input from local fire departments, of the effectiveness of the criteria the Office of Emergency Services uses to approve requests for prepositioning of mutual aid resources. (c) A summary of the extent to which the Office of Emergency Services initiated the prepositioning of resources due to forecasts of inclement weather. (d) If an emergency event happened, data describing the outcomes of the event. This could include, but is not limited to, the total number of acres affected, the number of structures affected, and the total number of deaths and injuries. Because California is subject to a variety of potential events, including, but not limited to, fires, floods, earthquakes, and tsunamis, the nature of this information may vary based on the type of the event. The information provided shall identify whether the event resulted in a federal- or state-declared disaster. 5. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $12,500,000 shall be used for the Listos California Grant program. The Listos California Grant program shall be managed by the Office of Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion within the Executive Office of the Office of Emergency Services. The grants shall be used to provide accessible and culturally competent outreach and resources with assessment and criteria for allocation of funds prioritized for, but not limited to, geographic areas of greatest all hazard risk and vulnerability as highlighted in and demonstrated by the California State Hazard Mitigation Plan; underresourced communities as defined in Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, subdivision (d) of Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code, or subdivision (g) of Section 75005 of the Public Resources Code. The grants shall be administered consistent with the emergency management system described in Section 8607 of the Government Code, including, but not limited to, being informed by community-based and nongovernmental organizations and local emergency service networks, including county emergency officials. The Office of Diversity, Equity, and Inclusion shall provide eligible organizations within the identified geographic areas an opportunity to apply to the Listos California Grant program. The Office of Emergency Services shall report to the appropriate budget committees of the Legislature, the Senate Committee on Governmental Organization, the Assembly Committee on Emergency Management, and the Legislative Analyst’s Office on the expenditure of these funds on or before February 1, 2026, including the following: (1) How funds were allocated. (2) What methods of outreach the Office of Equity used to inform eligible entities of the funding. (3) The entity or community that received the funding. (4) A description of projects funded. (b) This provision does not diminish or otherwise impact any of the Office of Emergency Services’ responsibilities under the California Emergency Services Act (Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 8550) of Division 1 of Title 2 of the Government Code), including, but not limited to, Sections 8550, 8569, 8570, 8570.3 of, and subdivision (e) of Section 8585 of, the Government Code. 6. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (1), $23,704,000 will be available to support California’s Law Enforcement Mutual Aid System. Notwithstanding any other law, the Office of Emergency Services may provide advance payment to local law enforcement agencies to cover costs when formally deployed through the Law Enforcement Mutual Aid System in support of a response to conditions that threaten public safety. For any activities that, subsequent to receiving this funding, become eligible for state or federal disaster funding, those payments will be remitted back to the General Fund. 10. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $5,000,000 shall be used to fund Internet Crimes Against Children Task Forces. No more than 5 percent of this amount may be used for administrative support costs. This amount is available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. 11. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $1,000,000 shall be provided to the Weaverville Fire Department for fire, rescue, and emergency medical services equipment and related expenses in Trinity County, including, but not limited to, radios, medical equipment, and extrication equipment. 12. Of the amount appropriated in Schedule (2), $2,000,000 shall be provided to the City of Hayward for Fire Department station upgrades. SEC. 7. Item 0690-103-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 0690-103-0001—For local assistance, Office of Emergency Services ........................ 96,000,000 Schedule: (1) 0385-Special Programs and Grant Management ........................ 96,000,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item is for the California State Nonprofit Security Grant Program to help nonprofit organizations that are targets of hate-motivated violence and hate crimes, and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027. SEC. 8. Item 0840-001-3268 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 0840-001-3268—For support of the Controller, payable from the Senior Citizens and Disabled Citizens Property Tax Postponement Fund ........................ 2,798,000 Schedule: (1) 0500-State Controller’s Office ........................ 2,798,000 Provisions: 1. The funding provided in this item shall cover costs for personal services and related operating expenses and equipment for administration of the Property Tax Postponement Program. The continuous appropriation pursuant to Section 16180 of the Government Code from the Senior Citizens and Disabled Citizens Property Tax Postponement Fund is allowed for property tax payments to counties and other direct program costs, such as the cost of title searches and appraisals incurred by the Controller covering real property held in the name of an account, or legal costs associated with the enforcement and administration of the Property Tax Postponement Program. No moneys from the fund, beyond those appropriated in this item, shall be used for personal services and related operating expenses and equipment. 2. Notwithstanding paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 16180 of the Government Code, on a one-time basis for the 2024–25 fiscal year, property tax postponement disbursements from the Senior Citizens and Disabled Citizens Property Tax Postponement Fund may exceed 1 percent of the amount available in the fund for residential dwellings that are manufactured homes. SEC. 9. Item 3900-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 3900-101-0001—For local assistance, State Air Resources Board ........................ 2,000,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 2,000,000 Provisions: 1. The funds appropriated in Schedule (1) shall be used for the Funding Agricultural Replacement Measures for Emission Reductions Program. 2. Not more than 5 percent of the amounts appropriated in this item may be used for administrative costs. The funds in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, and shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2029. 3. The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to guidelines or other standards adopted and used in administering the funds appropriated in this item. SEC. 10. Item 3900-101-3119 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 3900-101-3119—For local assistance, State Air Resources Board, payable from the Air Quality Improvement Fund ........................ 34,940,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 34,940,000 Provisions: 1. The funds in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, and shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2029. SEC. 11. Item 3900-101-3122 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 3900-101-3122—For local assistance, State Air Resources Board, payable from the Enhanced Fleet Modernization Subaccount, High Polluter Repair or Removal Account ........................ 19,800,000 Schedule: (1) 3500-Mobile Source ........................ 19,800,000 Provisions: 1. (a) $19,800,000 shall be available for the Clean Cars 4 All Program pursuant to Section 44124.5 of the Health and Safety Code, exclusively for districts participating in the Clean Cars 4 All Program. Of this amount, funding shall be prioritized for districts that have insufficient funds to meet processed demand. (b) Not more than 5 percent of the amount appropriated in this item may be used for the State Air Resources Board’s administrative costs. The funds in this item shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2027, and shall be available for liquidation until June 30, 2029. Funds used for the State Air Resources Board’s administrative costs shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. SEC. 12. Item 3940-001-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 3940-001-0001—For support of State Water Resources Control Board ........................ 74,064,000 Schedule: (1) 3560-Water Quality ........................ 35,785,000 (2) 3565-Drinking Water Quality ........................ 7,496,000 (3) 3570-Water Rights ........................ 30,394,000 (4) 3575-Department of Justice Legal Services ........................ 389,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in Program 3575 shall be used to reimburse the Department of Justice for legal services. In addition to the amount in Program 3575, upon order of the Director of Finance, any non-General Fund Budget Act item for support of the State Water Resources Control Board may be augmented to reimburse the Department of Justice for legal services. An augmentation shall not be made sooner than 30 days after the Joint Legislative Budget Committee has been notified in writing. 2. Of this amount, $981,000 is to reimburse the State Department of Public Health for lease-revenue bond base rental payments associated with the State Water Resources Control Board’s occupancy in the State Department of Public Health’s Richmond Laboratory. 3. The Controller shall transfer funds appropriated in this item to the State Department of Public Health, in the amount shown in Provision 2, as and when provided for in the schedule submitted by the State Public Works Board. SEC. 13. Item 3940-492 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 3940-492—Reappropriation, State Water Resources Control Board. Notwithstanding any other law, the period to liquidate encumbrances of the following citations is extended to June 30, 2029: 0001—General Fund (1) Section 19.58(b)(4)(B)(ii) of the Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022) for the planning, design, and construction of the Euclid Avenue Recycled Water System Expansion Project in the City of Ontario. SEC. 14. Item 3960-012-0557 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 3960-012-0557—For transfer by the Controller from the Toxic Substances Control Account to the Site Remediation Account ........................ (20,514,000) SEC. 15. Item 4260-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 4260-101-0001—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, California Medical Assistance Program, payable from the Health Care Deposit Fund after transfer from the General Fund ........................ 36,273,435,000 Schedule: (1) 3960014-Eligibility (County Administration) ........................ 0 (2) 3960015-County and Other Local Assistance Administration ........................ 1,569,652,000 (3) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 37,184,208,000 (4) Reimbursements to 3960015-County and Other Local Assistance Administration ........................ −45,317,000 (5) Reimbursements to 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ −2,435,108,000 Provisions: 1. The aggregate principal amount of disproportionate share hospital general obligation debt that may be issued in the current fiscal year pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (f) of Section 14085.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall be $0. 2. Notwithstanding any other law, both the federal and nonfederal shares of any moneys recovered for previously paid health care services, provided pursuant to Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, are hereby appropriated and shall be expended as soon as practicable for medical care and services as defined in the Welfare and Institutions Code. 3. Notwithstanding any other law, accounts receivable for recoveries as described in Provision 2 shall have no effect upon the positive balance of the General Fund or the Health Care Deposit Fund. Notwithstanding any other law, moneys recovered as described in this item that are required to be transferred from the Health Care Deposit Fund to the General Fund shall be credited by the Controller to the General Fund without regard to the appropriation from which it was drawn. 4. Without regard to fiscal year, the General Fund shall make one or more loans available not to exceed a cumulative total of $45,000,000 to be transferred as needed to the Health Care Deposit Fund to meet cash needs. All moneys so transferred shall be repaid as soon as sufficient reimbursements have been collected to meet immediate cash needs and in installments as reimbursements accumulate if the loan is outstanding for more than one year. 5. Notwithstanding any other law, the State Department of Health Care Services may give public notice relative to proposing or amending any rule or regulation or administrative directive that could result in increased costs in the Medi-Cal program only after approval by the Department of Finance. Additionally, any rule or regulation adopted by the State Department of Health Care Services and any communication that increases costs in the Medi-Cal program shall be effective only after the date upon which it is approved by the Department of Finance. 6. Change orders to the medical or the dental fiscal intermediary contract for amounts exceeding a total cost of $250,000 shall be approved by the Department of Finance not sooner than 30 days after written notification of the change order is provided to the chairpersons of the fiscal and policy committees in each house of the Legislature and to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, or not sooner than whatever lesser time after that notification as the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, may determine. The semiannual estimates of Medi-Cal expenditures provided to the Legislature in January and May may constitute the notification required by this provision. 7. Recoveries of advances made to counties in prior years pursuant to Section 14153 of the Welfare and Institutions Code are reappropriated to the Health Care Deposit Fund for reimbursement of those counties where allowable costs exceeded the amounts advanced. Recoveries in excess of the amounts required to fully reimburse allowable costs shall be transferred to the General Fund. When a projected deficiency exists in the California Medical Assistance Program, these funds, subject to notification to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee, are appropriated and shall be expended as soon as practicable for the state’s share of payments for medical care and services and county and other local assistance administration. 8. The Department of Finance may transfer funds representing all or any portion of any estimated savings that are a result of improvements in the Medi-Cal claims processing procedures from the Medi-Cal services budget or the support budget of the State Department of Health Care Services (Item 4260-001-0001) to the fiscal intermediary budget item for purposes of making improvements to the Medi-Cal claims system. 9. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between schedules within this item and between this item and Items 4260-102-0001, 4260-111-0001, 4260-114-0001, and 4260-117-0001 in order to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. The Department of Finance may revise reimbursement authority in this item in order to effectively administer the programs funded in those items. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing such a transfer unless prior notification of the transfer has been included in the Medi-Cal estimates submitted pursuant to Section 14100.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall include the reasons for the transfer, the fiscal assumptions used in calculating the transfer amount, and any potential fiscal effects on the program from which funds are being transferred or for which funds are being reduced. 10. If a federal grant that provides 75 percent federal financial participation to allow individuals in nursing homes to voluntarily move into a community setting and still receive the same amount of funding for services is awarded to the State Department of Health Care Services during the current fiscal year, then, notwithstanding any other law, the department may count expenditures from the appropriation made to this item as state matching funds for that grant. 11. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize an increase to this appropriation to address costs resulting from adverse court rulings. The Department of Finance shall provide a 30-day notice of any proposed increase to the Legislature. The notification shall include the specifics of any cases with adverse rulings and the overall fiscal impact. Submission of the semiannual Medi-Cal estimate provided to the Legislature in January and May shall be considered meeting the notification requirement of this provision if the required information is included in the estimate. 12. To the extent practicable and consistent with existing procedures, the State Department of Health Care Services, in its sole discretion, shall seek favorable terms from the federal government regarding the repayment of federal funds for state-only populations in order to minimize the annual impact on the General Fund in any individual fiscal year. 13. (a) Of the funds appropriated in this item, $132,500,000 is available to implement the Behavioral Health Bridge Housing Program to award competitive grants to qualified counties and tribal entities to address the immediate housing and treatment needs of people experiencing unsheltered homelessness who have serious behavioral health conditions. (b) The State Department of Health Care Services shall determine the methodology and distribution of the grant funds appropriated for the Behavioral Health Bridge Housing Program. (c) An entity shall expend the funds to supplement, and not supplant, existing funds provided for the housing and treatment needs of people experiencing unsheltered homelessness who have serious behavioral health conditions to receive grant funds. (d) The Behavioral Health Bridge Housing Program shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, the State Department of Health Care Services determines that federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is not jeopardized. (e) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of information notices or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. (f) For purposes of implementing the Behavioral Health Bridge Housing Program, the State Department of Health Care Services may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 16. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may adjust amounts in this item, Item 4260-111-0001, or any other related item resulting from the State Department of Health Care Services obtaining federal approval to claim federal financial participation for expenditures associated with Designated State Health Programs as part of the CalAIM Demonstration. Within 30 days of making any adjustment pursuant to this provision, the Department of Finance shall report the adjustment in writing to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. Submission of the semiannual Medi-Cal estimate provided to the Legislature in January and May shall be considered meeting the reporting requirement of this provision if the required information is included in the estimate. 17. (a) The nonfederal share amounts received by the department as monetary sanctions collected in the 2024–25 state fiscal year pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 14197.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code shall, pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (q) of Section 14197.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, be deposited into the General Fund. (b) This item shall be augmented by the amount deposited into the General Fund pursuant to subprovision (a), which shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2026, for the department to award grants to qualifying, non-profit legal aid programs and organizations that serve Medi-Cal managed care enrollees in the County of Los Angeles or other impacted counties, as necessary. (c) The department shall determine the eligibility criteria, methodology, and distribution of funds appropriated in this provision. (d) The department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis for purposes of implementing this provision. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and from the State Administrative and State Contracting manuals, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services. 19. (a) Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (2), up to $10,000,000 is available for the Hearing Aid Coverage for Children Program for the purpose of providing medically necessary hearing aids and related services to eligible persons as described in subprovision (b). (b) A person is eligible for the program described in this provision if they meet all of the following criteria: (1) (A) The person is under 18 years of age; or (B) effective January 1, 2023, the person is under 21 years of age. (2) The person’s household income does not exceed 600 percent of the federal poverty level. (3) The person is not eligible for the Medi-Cal program or the California Children’s Services Program. (4) The person does not have health insurance coverage for hearing aids. (c) For purposes of paragraph (4) of subprovision (b), a person is deemed to have no health insurance coverage if any of the following apply: (1) The person has no health insurance coverage. (2) The person has health insurance coverage that excludes coverage for hearing aids. (3) Effective January 1, 2023, the person has health insurance coverage that has a coverage limit of $1,500 or less for hearing aids. (d) The State Department of Health Care Services shall specify the benefits and services provided to eligible persons under the program described in this provision. This shall include hearing aids, including bone conduction devices, when medically necessary. (e) The State Department of Health Care Services shall develop processes to ensure, to the extent practicable, health insurance coverage for hearing aids and related services covered pursuant to this provision is used before the Hearing Aid Coverage for Children Program is billed. (f) The State Department of Health Care Services may contract with public and private entities in order to implement this provision. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this provision shall be exempt from Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 14600) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Article 4 (commencing with Section 19130) of Chapter 5 of Part 2 of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, the State Contracting Manual and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the State Department of General Services. Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of provider bulletin or similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. 20. Of the amounts appropriated in Schedule (2), $16,870,000 is available for encumbrance or expenditure for the State Department of Health Care Services to support the development of a video series to provide parents with resources and skills to support their children’s mental health and to develop next generation digital supports for remote mental health assessment and intervention as a component of the Children and Youth Behavioral Health Initiative. 21. (a) Of the amounts available in this item, $33,895,000 is available to reimburse counties for the cost of administering the Health Care Program for Children in Foster Care (HCPCFC) and California Children’s Services Compliance Monitoring and Oversight Program as described in subprovision (b). (b) (1) For state fiscal year 2024–25, the State Department of Health Care Services shall authorize a county to deviate from the department’s established allocation staffing methodology governing the use of county HCPCFC administrative budget and California Children’s Services Compliance Monitoring and Oversight Program for the purposes of extending flexibility to the county regarding appropriate staffing necessary to implement and operationalize the HCPCFC program manual requirements and readiness activities for California Children’s Services Compliance Monitoring and Oversight Program. (2) To be eligible to deviate from the State Department of Health Care Services’ allocation staffing methodology as described in this subprovision, the county shall, by October 1, 2024, provide a report to the department articulating the proposed use of funds to support HCPCFC and California Children’s Services Compliance Monitoring and Oversight Program activities, including direct and indirect administrative costs. The report shall be approved through the county’s Board of Supervisors prior to submission to the State Department of Health Care Services, and the county shall provide proof of such approval. Any county that seeks authorization pursuant to this subprovision must submit reports detailing the use of funds in a form and manner required by the department. (3) The State Department of Health Care Services shall report at time of budget committees on the number of counties that requested to deviate from the department’s methodology and a summary of the magnitude and nature of those requests. (4) If a county deviating from the State Department of Health Care Services’ methodology is the subject of quality of care concerns or fails to meet performance measures for the applicable program during state fiscal year 2024–25, the department may revoke its authorization. (c) Authority under this provision shall be granted only if, and to the extent that, the State Department of Health Care Services determines that federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program is not jeopardized. (d) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the State Department of Health Care Services may implement, interpret, or make specific this provision, in whole or in part, by means of information notices or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action. 23. Of the amount available in this item, $1,000,000 shall be for Hope the Mission for mobile mental health equipment and vehicles. 24. Of the amount available in this item, $25,000,000 shall be for the State Department of Health Care Services to make a direct payment to Martin Luther King. Jr. Community Hospital in South Los Angeles to support the hospital in 2024–25. 25. Of the amount available in this item, $5,000,000 shall be made available for one-time direct payment to Los Angeles County to support the development of an interim housing project at Metropolitan State Hospital. 26. Of the amount available in this item, $500,000 shall be made available for one-time direct payment to Humboldt County to support the Mad River Behavioral Health Crisis Triage Center. SEC. 16. Item 4260-101-0890 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 4260-101-0890—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Federal Trust Fund ........................ 106,364,354,000 Schedule: (1) 3960015-County and Other Local Assistance Administration ........................ 5,355,083,000 (2) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 101,009,271,000 Provisions: 1. Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may authorize the transfer of expenditure authority between Schedules (1) and (2) of this item and between this item and Items 4260-102-0890, 4260-106-0890, 4260-111-0890, 4260-114-0890, and 4260-117-0890 in order to effectively administer the programs funded in these items. The Department of Finance shall notify the Legislature within 10 days of authorizing such a transfer unless prior notification of the transfer has been included in the Medi-Cal estimates submitted pursuant to Section 14100.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code. The 10-day notification to the Legislature shall include the reasons for the transfer, the fiscal assumptions used in calculating the transfer amount, and any potential fiscal effects on the program from which funds are being transferred or for which funds are being reduced. 2. (a) The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures payable from the Federal Trust Fund (Item 4260-101-0890) in those amounts made necessary by changes in either caseload or payments. (b) If the Department of Finance determines that the estimate of expenditures will exceed the expenditures authorized for this item, the Department of Finance shall so report to the Legislature. At the time the report is made, the amount of the appropriation made in this item shall be increased by the amount of the excess unless and until otherwise provided by law. SEC. 17. Item 4260-101-8140 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 4260-101-8140—For local assistance, State Department of Health Care Services, payable from the Vision Services CHIP-HSI Special Fund ........................ 1,378,000 Schedule: (1) 3960022-Benefits (Medical Care and Services) ........................ 1,378,000 SEC. 18. Item 4260-491 is added to Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024, to read: 4260-491—Reappropriation, State Department of Health Care Services. The amount specified in the following citation is reappropriated for the purposes provided for in this appropriation and shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure until September 30, 2025: 0890—Federal Trust Fund (1) Up to $57,450,000 of the amount appropriated in Section 4 of Chapter 75 of the Statutes of 2021 to support community mental health services. SEC. 19. Item 5180-001-0131 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 5180-001-0131—For support of State Department of Social Services, payable from the Foster Family Home and Small Family Home Insurance Fund ........................ 1,596,000 Schedule: (1) 4275-Social Services and Licensing ........................ 1,596,000 Provisions: 1. The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures from the unexpended balance available from prior years’ appropriations in the Foster Family Home and Small Family Home Insurance Fund during the 2024–25 fiscal year, in those amounts made necessary by increases in either the payment of claims or the costs of operating and maintaining the Foster Family Home and Small Family Home Insurance Fund, which are within or in excess of amounts appropriated in this act for that year. If the Department of Finance determines that the estimate of expenditures will exceed the expenditures authorized for the 2024–25 fiscal year, the department shall notify the Legislature. Upon notification, the amount of the appropriation made in this item shall be increased by the amount of such excess from the unexpended balance available from prior years’ appropriations in the Foster Family Home and Small Family Home Insurance Fund. 2. The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures up to $2,000,000 in excess of the amount appropriated in this item, upon notification from the State Department of Social Services of approved claims exceeding the amount appropriated in this item, to cover the additional costs associated with the increased annual claims paid on behalf of foster family homes, small family homes, resource families, and tribally-approved homes pursuant to Sections 1527 to 1527.8, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code. The Department of Finance shall provide notification of the adjustment to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 working days from the date the Department of Finance approves the adjustment. SEC. 20. Item 5180-011-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 5180-011-0001—For transfer by the Controller to the Foster Family Home and Small Family Home Insurance Fund ........................ 600,000 Provisions: 1. Provision 1 of Item 5180-001-0131 also applies to this item. 2. The Department of Finance is authorized to approve expenditures up to $2,000,000 in excess of the transfer amount appropriated in this item, upon notification from the State Department of Social Services of approved claims exceeding the amount appropriated in this item, to cover the additional costs associated with the increased annual claims paid on behalf of foster family homes, small family homes, resource families, and tribally-approved homes pursuant to Sections 1527 to 1527.8, inclusive, of the Health and Safety Code. The Department of Finance shall provide notification of the adjustment to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee within 10 working days from the date the Department of Finance approves the adjustment. SEC. 21. Item 5227-122-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 5227-122-0001—For local assistance, Board of State and Community Corrections ........................ 17,250,000 Schedule: (1) 4945-Corrections Planning and Grant Programs ........................ 17,250,000 Provisions: 1. These funds shall be awarded by the Board of State and Community Corrections as competitive grants to federally recognized Indian tribes in California to support efforts to identify, collect case-level data, publicize, and investigate and solve cases involving missing and murdered indigenous people. The board shall consult with and include stakeholders from the indigenous community to inform the grant outreach process and the process to select and administer grants. 2. Grants should focus on activities including, but not limited to, developing culturally based prevention strategies, strengthening responses to human trafficking, and improving cooperation and communication on jurisdictional issues between state, local, federal, and tribal law enforcement in order to investigate and solve cases involving missing and murdered indigenous people. Allowable expenditures may include reimbursement to eligible tribes for contracted services with local law enforcement agencies for staffing in support of eligible grant activities. 3. Of the amount identified in this item, up to 5 percent shall be available to the Board of State and Community Corrections for transfer to Schedule (1) of Item 5227-001-0001 for costs to administer the grant programs. Funds transferred pursuant to this provision are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 4. Funds appropriated in this item are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2029. 5. The Board of State and Community Corrections shall provide an initial report to the Legislature by December 1, 2023, an interim report by December 31, 2028, and a final report by December 31, 2029, that includes, but is not limited to, information about the grant recipients, the allocation of funds, and applicable metrics and outcomes of the program. SEC. 22. Item 6100-488 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 6100-488—Reappropriation, State Department of Education. Notwithstanding any other law, the balances from the following appropriations are available for reappropriation for the purposes specified in the provisions below: 0001—​General Fund (1) $220,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the K–12 Mandated Programs Block Grant in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-296-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (2) $22,248,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the 21st Century Community Learning Centers Program in Schedule (2) of Item 6100-149-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (3) $204,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the California American Indian Education Centers in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-151-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (4) $26,800,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Child Nutrition Programs in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-203-0001, Budget Act of 2021 (Chs. 21, 69, and 240, Stats. 2021). (5) $18,823,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Special Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs in Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021. (6) $1,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the American Indian Early Childhood Education Program in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-150-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (7) $500,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Special Education Program for Individuals with Exceptional Needs in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-161-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (8) $490,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the K–12 Mandated Programs Block Grant in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-296-0001, Budget Act of 2022 (Chs. 43, 45, and 249, Stats. 2022). (9) $19,037,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Career Technical Education Incentive Grant Program in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-168-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (10) $150,000,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Inclusive Early Education Expansion Program in Schedule (3) of Item 6100-196-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chs. 12, 38, and 189, Stats. 2023). (11) $1,000,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Reading Difficulties Risk Screener Selection Panel in Chapter 48 of the Statutes of 2023. (12) $5,072,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the California Community College Strong Workforce Program in Schedule (16) of Item 6870-101-0001, Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6 and 7, Stats. 2020). (13) $292,000 or whatever greater or lesser amount of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Adults in Correctional Facilities Program in Schedule (1) of Item 6100-158-0001, Budget Act of 2023 (Chapter 12, 38, and 189, Stats 2023). (14) $1,000,000 of the unexpended balance of the amount appropriated for the Expanded Learning Opportunities Program in Chapter 44 of the Statutes of 2021. Provisions: 1. The sum of $239,395,000 is hereby appropriated to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for allocation to school districts and charter schools in the 2024–25 fiscal year pursuant to Section 42238.02 of the Education Code pursuant to the provisions provided in the 2024 Education Omnibus trailer bill for this purpose. 2. (a) The sum of $5,000,000 is hereby appropriated to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for allocation to the Marin County Office of Education to contract with the California Teachers Collaborative for Holocaust and Genocide Education to continue its work to do both of the following: (1) Develop and provide curriculum resources related to genocide and Holocaust education. (2) Provide professional development, including educator trainings, on genocide and Holocaust education. (b) The funds allocated pursuant to this provision are available for encumbrance and expenditure until June 30, 2029. (c) Of the amount appropriated in subprovision (a), no more than 5 percent shall be available for reimbursement to the Marin County Office of Education for administrative activities. 3. The sum of $292,000 is hereby appropriated to the Superintendent of Public Instruction for costs associated with administering the English Language Development Assessment, pursuant to Provision 9 of Item 6100-113-0001. 4. The sum of $1,000,000 is hereby appropriated to the Fiscal Crisis Management and Assistance Team for costs associated with providing technical assistance to local educational agencies impacted by fires pursuant to this provision. Notwithstanding any other law, the Los Angeles Unified School District, Pasadena Unified School District, and any impacted charter schools located within those school districts, may request, by June 30, 2025, the Fiscal Crisis and Management Assistance Team to conduct an evaluation of the need for additional funding and statutory changes for the 2026–27, 2027–28, and 2028–29 fiscal years as a result of the state of emergency declared by the Governor in January 2025 and provide recommendations to the Department of Finance, the Legislature, and the Superintendent of Public Instruction by November 1, 2025. SEC. 23. Item 6360-001-0407 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: 6360-001-0407—For support of Commission on Teacher Credentialing, payable from the Teacher Credentials Fund ........................ 28,559,000 Schedule: (1) 5381-Preparation and Licensing of Teachers ........................ 16,447,000 (2) 5382-Attorney General Legal Services ........................ 4,850,000 (3) 5383-Accreditation Streamline Project ........................ 310,000 (4) 5399-Administration ........................ 7,260,000 (5) Reimbursements to 5381-Preparation and Licensing of Teachers ........................ −308,000 Provisions: 1. The amount appropriated in this item may be increased based on increases in credential applications, increases in first-time credential applications requiring fingerprint clearance, unanticipated costs associated with certificate discipline cases, or unanticipated costs of litigation, subject to approval of the Department of Finance, not sooner than 30 days after notification in writing to the chairpersons of the fiscal committees of each house of the Legislature and the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee. 2. The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall submit biannual reports to the chairpersons and vice chairpersons of the budget committees of each house of the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance on the minimum, maximum, and average number of days taken to process: (a) renewal and university-recommended credentials, (b) out-of-state and special education credentials, (c) service credentials and supplemental authorizations, (d) adult and career technical education certificates and child center permits, (e) temporary permits for statutory leave and 30-day substitute permits, (f) provisional intern permits, (g) short-term staff permits, and (h) the percentage of renewals and new applications completed online. The report should also include information on the total number of each type of application and the hours of staff time utilized to process the different types of credentials. The biannual reports shall be submitted on October 1 and March 1 of each year, and shall include historical data as well as data from the most recent six months. 3. Of the funds appropriated in Schedule (1), $308,000 is provided from federal Title II funds through an interagency agreement with the State Department of Education to support Teacher Misassignment Monitoring, pursuant to Section 44258.9 of the Education Code. These funds shall be used to reimburse county offices of education for costs associated with monitoring public schools and school districts for teacher misassignments. Funds shall be allocated on a basis determined by the Commission on Teacher Credentialing. Districts and county offices receiving funds for credential monitoring will provide reasonable and necessary information to the commission as a condition of receiving these funds. 4. The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall submit biannual reports to the chairpersons and vice chairpersons of the budget committees of each house of the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance on the workload of the Division of Professional Practices (DPP) and the status of the teacher misconduct caseload. The report shall include information on the DPP’s workload and the timeliness of completing key steps in reviewing teacher misconduct cases that are under the control of the commission. The workload report shall include the number of cases opened by case type and the average number of days and targets for each key step in the misconduct review process, including: (a) intake of new cases and documents, (b) assignment of cases to staff and gathering of needed documents for investigation, (c) investigation and notification of allegations to individuals charged with an offense, (d) review of cases by the commission, (e) implementation of final discipline decisions by the commission, (f) monitoring during probation period, and (g) response to violation of probationary period. The biannual reports shall be submitted by October 1 and March 1 of each year. All reports shall include historical data as well as data from the most recent six months. 5. (a) The Attorney General shall submit a biannual report to the chairpersons and vice chairpersons of the budget committees of each house of the Legislature, the Legislative Analyst’s Office, and the Department of Finance concerning the status of the teacher misconduct discipline caseload and other cases being handled by the Attorney General for the Commission on Teacher Credentialing. The biannual report shall be submitted by August 30 and February 28 of each year for the previous corresponding fiscal quarters. (b) Each report shall include, at a minimum, all of the following for teacher discipline matters: (1) The number of matters with the Attorney General at the beginning of the reporting period. (2) The number of matters for which further investigation was requested by the Attorney General. (3) The number of matters for which further investigation was received by the Attorney General. (4) The number of matters adjudicated by the Attorney General. (5) The number of matters with the Attorney General at the end of the reporting period. (6) The minimum, maximum, and median number of days from the date the Attorney General receives an accusation or statement of issues referral from the commission to the commencement of a hearing at the Office of Administrative Hearings for cases adjudicated during this period. (c) To determine the average cost of the Attorney General to adjudicate a case representing the commission, each report shall provide the following information for cases adjudicated in the reporting period specified in subdivision (a): (1) The average and median number of hours worked by the staff of the Attorney General to adjudicate accusation and statement of issues matters. (2) The average and median fees charged by the Attorney General to the commission to adjudicate accusation and statement of issues matters. (3) The average and median litigation costs to adjudicate accusation and statement of issues matters. (d) To determine the total activities conducted by the Attorney General to represent the commission for each period, the Attorney General shall report the following: (1) The total hours worked during the period by staff of the Attorney General for representation of the commission in teacher discipline matters. (2) The total fees charged during the period by the Attorney General to the commission for representation in teacher discipline matters. (3) The total hours worked during the period by staff of the Attorney General for representation of the commission unrelated to teacher discipline matters. (4) The total fees charged during the period by the Attorney General to the commission for representation unrelated to teacher discipline matters. (e) This information shall be provided with the intent that recipients shall be able to determine the caseload input and output of the Attorney General in relation to representation of the commission in teacher discipline cases, especially as it relates to determining the average case processing time for accusation and statement of issues representation and adjudication, and proper funding level for handling the teacher discipline caseload and other legal work for the commission. Staff from the Attorney General shall provide timely followup information to staff from the offices identified in subdivision (a) upon request if further explanation or information is required. 6. (a) The Commission on Teacher Credentialing and the State Department of Education (SDE) shall maintain a data-sharing agreement to provide the commission with certificated employee assignment data necessary to annually identify misassignments, as defined in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (5) of subdivision (b) of Section 33126 of the Education Code, at school districts and county offices of education. The data-sharing agreement shall also require the commission to make teacher credential, misassignment, and other relevant data available to the SDE to support federally required reporting consistent with the California State Plan for the federal Every Student Succeeds Act (P.L. 114-95) approved by the State Board of Education. (b) The commission shall use the nonpersonally identifiable educator identification number required by Section 44230.5 of the Education Code for the purpose of sharing data with local educational agencies and the SDE pursuant to this provision. 7. The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall submit an annual report to the Department of Finance in September of each year detailing changes to contracts with examination providers, changes in examination fees, teacher examination validation, equating, or alignment studies, and teacher examination development conducted during the previous fiscal year. 8. Funds appropriated in Schedule (2) may be used to fund costs incurred from the administration and adjudication of cases, which include representation from the Attorney General and the administrative hearing process through the Office of Administrative Hearings. SEC. 24. Section 15.00 is added to the Budget Act of 2024, to read: SEC. 15.00. (a) The following amounts are hereby appropriated from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund to the following entities: (1) $30,904,000 to the Sierra Nevada Conservancy for the purposes authorized in subdivision (h) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code. (2) $23,524,000 to the California Tahoe Conservancy for the purposes authorized in subdivision (i) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code. (3) $31,349,000 to the Santa Monica Mountains Conservancy for the purposes authorized in subdivision (j) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code. (4) $30,904,000 to the State Coastal Conservancy for the purposes authorized in subdivision (k) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code. (5) $30,904,000 to the San Gabriel and Lower Los Angeles Rivers and Mountains Conservancy for the purposes authorized in subdivision (l) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code. (6) $23,524,000 to the San Diego River Conservancy for the purposes authorized in subdivision (m) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code. (7) $10,000,000 to the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection to fund training center infrastructure for a fire resiliency center for the Karuk Tribe pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 91520 of the Public Resources Code. (b) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to the amendment of existing program guidelines and selection criteria needed to effectuate or implement appropriations in this section from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund. It is the intent of the Legislature to consider other statutory adjustments related to the Administrative Procedure Act, as it relates to appropriations from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund, in conjunction with enactment of the Budget Act of 2025. (c) The funds appropriated in this section are available for encumbrance or expenditure until June 30, 2028. SEC. 25. Section 15.14 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: SEC. 15.14. (a) Any appropriation from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund shall be subject to the restrictions specified in subdivision (b). (b) No department shall encumber or commit more than 75 percent of any appropriation prior to the fourth cap and trade auction in the 2024–25 fiscal year. Upon determination of the final amount of auction proceeds after the fourth cap and trade auction, the Department of Finance shall make a final determination for the expenditure of the remaining available auction proceeds. The Department of Finance shall notify the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no later than 30 days after its final determination if there are decreased auction proceeds that require a modification to the expenditure of funds. (d) Subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 39719 of the Health and Safety Code requires 5 percent of annual proceeds to be transferred to the Safe and Affordable Drinking Water Fund. The Director of Finance may transfer to the Safe and Affordable Drinking Water Fund an additional amount equal to the difference between the amount transferred in a quarter pursuant to subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 39719 of the Health and Safety Code and $32,500,000 per quarter of the 2024–25 fiscal year. (e) The Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code) does not apply to guidelines or other standards adopted and used by a state agency in administering an allocation of moneys from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund. (f) The following amounts shall not be included in determining the amount of annual proceeds of the fund for purposes of the calculation in Section 39719 of the Health and Safety Code: (1) Amounts appropriated by subparagraph (A) of paragraph (3) of subdivision (g) of Section 6377.1 of the Revenue and Taxation Code. (2) Amounts described in Sections 4210 to 4214, inclusive, of the Public Resources Code to replace the revenues generated by the State Responsibility Area fire prevention fee authorized by Section 4212 of the Public Resources Code, which is suspended, pending repeal, pursuant to Section 4213.05 of the Public Resources Code. (g) The following provisions apply to specified Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund appropriations, including Items 0540-001-3228, 0650-101-3228, 3360-001-3228 (Schedule 2), 3640-101-3228, 3760-102-3228, 3860-001-3228, 3860-101-3228, 3860-301-3228, and 3940-102-3228. (1) The funds shall be used for the purpose of facilitating the achievement of reductions of greenhouse gas emissions in this state in accordance with the requirements of Section 39712 of the Health and Safety Code or to improve climate change adaptation and resiliency, or environmental quality and public health, of California’s communities, with an emphasis on disadvantaged communities, as defined in Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code, or low-income households or communities, as defined in Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code, consistent with Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code. (2) A state agency may also comply with the requirements of paragraphs (2) and (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 16428.9 of the Government Code by describing how each proposed expenditure will improve climate change adaptation and resiliency, or environmental quality and public health, of disadvantaged communities or low-income households or communities. (3) For the purposes of subdivision (b) of Section 16428.9 of the Government Code and Section 39720 of the Health and Safety Code, the State Air Resources Board, in consultation with the relevant state agency, may develop methodologies and collect metrics or other information related to the description provided pursuant to paragraph (2) from the state agency. SEC. 26. Section 39.10 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: SEC. 39.10. In addition to this act, the Budget Act of 2024 consists of the following statutes: (a) Chapter 22 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 107). (b) Chapter 35 of the Statutes of 2024 (Senate Bill No. 108). (c) Chapter 994 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 157). (d) Chapter 995 of the Statutes of 2024 (Assembly Bill No. 180). (e) Chapter 1 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Assembly Bill No. 4). (f) Chapter 2 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Senate Bill No. 3). (g) Chapter 3 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Senate Bill No. 1). (h) Chapter 4 of the Statutes of 2025, First Extraordinary Session (Senate Bill No. 2). SEC. 27. Section 90.00 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: SEC. 90.00. (a) The Director of Finance may augment the amount of any department or agency appropriation from any available source of funding, including, but not limited to, the General Fund for the purposes described in this section. Augmentations pursuant to this section shall not exceed a cumulative total of $1,500,000,000. (b) Augmentations pursuant to subdivision (a) are hereby authorized for use by state departments and entities for uses consistent with the purposes of the Disaster Response-Emergency Operations Account concerning areas of the state affected by wildfire states of emergency that were declared by the Governor in January 2025. Those uses include, but are not limited to, emergency protective measures, evacuations, sheltering for survivors, household hazardous waste removal, assessment and remediation of post-fire hazards such as flash flooding and debris flows, traffic control, air quality and water and other environmental testing, and other actions to protect health, protect the safety of persons or property, and expedite recovery. (c) Augmentations authorized pursuant to this section shall not be made sooner than three days following the transmittal of a notification of the approval to the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or an earlier date as determined by the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee, except that, for the first $1,000,000,000 of augmentation authority pursuant to subdivision (a), the augmentations may be implemented in full immediately with no delay upon such a notification to the chairperson. (d) This section does not change, alter, limit, or constrain the emergency powers of the Governor and the executive branch in state law, including, but not limited to, the Governor’s fiscal authority related to emergencies. (e) Funds authorized by augmentations pursuant to this section shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure consistent with the existing encumbrance deadlines for the items of appropriation that are augmented or an alternate date as determined by the Director of Finance. The Department of Finance may create new items as necessary to facilitate the expenditure of funds augmented pursuant to this section. (f) (1) The Director of Finance may also augment any appropriation for the Office of Emergency Services to provide funding to be disbursed to Los Angeles County or cities within the county for unmet response and recovery needs resulting from damage caused by the Eaton Fire and Palisades Fire in Los Angeles County in January 2025. Funding provided pursuant to this paragraph shall not duplicate or replace benefits available or received through other existing assistance programs. (2) To the extent any reimbursements are awarded for work funded pursuant to this subdivision, those reimbursements shall be deposited into the General Fund. (g) (1) The Director of Finance may also augment any appropriation to provide backfills to affected taxing entities for property tax revenue losses occurring in the 2024–25 and 2025–26 fiscal years resulting from damages caused by the Eaton Fire and Palisades Fire in Los Angeles County in January 2025. (2) For purposes of this subdivision, “affected taxing entities” means counties, cities, and independent special districts. The Department of Finance shall make the final determination of whether a special district is independent. (3) To receive funds pursuant to this subdivision, the county auditor-controller shall submit to the Department of Finance a countywide claim detailing the losses incurred by affected taxing entities located in the county due to property damage caused by the wildfires described in this subdivision. The Department of Finance shall review the claims, and upon determining the claims are accurate and complete, shall provide notification as specified in subdivision (c). Once the requirements of subdivision (c) are fulfilled, the Department of Finance shall notify the Controller, who shall provide reimbursement in the amount specified by the Department of Finance to the county auditor-controller, who shall allocate those funds to the affected taxing entities as specified. (4) Notwithstanding any other law, the Department of Finance may augment Item 9210-102-0001 of this act or the Budget Act of 2025 for any property tax backfills authorized pursuant to this subdivision for cities, counties, and independent special districts. The allocation of funds authorized pursuant to this subdivision from Item 9210-102-0001 shall be governed solely by the provisions of this section. (h) (1) Augmentations authorized pursuant to this section and Section 90.01 of this act for the purposes specified in subdivision (b) shall be made on or before June 30, 2025. (2) Augmentations authorized pursuant to this section and Section 90.01 of this act for the purposes specified in subdivisions (f) and (g) shall be made on or before June 30, 2026. SEC. 28. Section 90.01 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: SEC. 90.01. (a) The Director of Finance may increase the augmentation authority provided in Section 90.00 of this act by up to an additional $1,000,000,000. (b) Augmentations made pursuant to this section may be made for the purposes authorized in Section 90.00 of this act. The deadlines in subdivision (h) of Section 90.00 apply to augmentations made pursuant to this section. (c) Augmentations authorized pursuant to this section shall not be made sooner than three days following the transmittal of a notification of the approval to the chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee or an earlier date as determined by the chairperson of the joint committee, or the chairperson’s designee. (d) This section does not change, alter, limit, or constrain the emergency powers of the Governor and the executive branch in state law, including, but not limited to, the Governor’s fiscal authority related to emergencies. (e) It is the intent of the Legislature to consider, for passage prior to the enactment of the Budget Act of 2025, the appropriation of bond funds from the Safe Drinking Water, Wildfire Prevention, Drought Preparedness, and Clean Air Fund, which was established by voter approval of Proposition 4 at the November 5, 2024, statewide general election, for wildfire and forest resilience activities. (f) Funds authorized by augmentations pursuant to this section shall be available for encumbrance or expenditure consistent with the existing encumbrance deadlines for the items of appropriation that are augmented or an alternate date as determined by the Director of Finance. The Department of Finance may create new items as necessary to facilitate the expenditure of funds augmented pursuant to this section. (g) The Department of Finance shall post on its internet website a Los Angeles Wildfire Response and Recovery Expenditure Report, including, to the extent feasible, summaries of the amounts and uses of funding spent by each state department or entity for the purposes described in this section and Section 90.00. This expenditure report shall be posted on or about February 7, 2025, and updated on or before February 28, 2025, March 31, 2025, April 30, 2025, May 31, 2025, and June 30, 2025. (h) The executive and legislative branches jointly express their intent that departments and entities receiving funding for January 2025 wildfire response and recovery shall continue to keep the Legislature informed pursuant to the reporting requirements in subdivision (g) and other means consistent with the comity of coequal branches of government. (i) The executive branch and any local entity receiving funds authorized by Section 90.00 of this act or this section shall seek reimbursements from the federal government for the maximum possible amount of funds related to response and recovery from the January 2025 wildfires. SEC. 29. Section 99.50 of the Budget Act of 2024 is amended to read: INDEX FOR CONTROL SECTIONS SEC. 99.50. The following is an index to the general sections of this act. These sections serve to define terms and identify restrictions concerning the appropriations contained in this act. 1.00 Budget Act Citation 1.50 Intent and Format 1.51 Citations to Prior Budget Acts 1.80 Availability of Appropriations 2.00 Items of Appropriation 3.00 Defines Purposes of Appropriations 3.10 Subschedule Transfers for Capital Projects 3.50 Benefit Charges Against Salaries and Wages 3.60 Contribution to Public Employees’ Retirement Benefits 3.61 Contribution to Prefund Other Postemployment Benefits 4.05 Budget Adjustment Authority 4.11 Position Vacancy Report 4.12 Vacant Position Savings 4.13 AB 85 Repayments to Counties 4.20 Contribution to Public Employees’ Contingency Reserve  Fund 4.30 Lease-Revenue Payment Adjustments 4.72 Electric Vehicle Charging Infrastructure 4.75 Statewide Surcharge 4.80 State Public Works Board Interim Financing 4.90 Architectural Revolving Fund Transfer 4.95 Inmate and Ward Construction Revolving Account Transfer 5.25 Attorney’s Fees 5.26 Legal Services Grant Funding 6.00 Project Alterations Limits 8.00 Antiterrorism Federal Reimbursements 8.50 Federal Funds Receipts 8.51 Federal Funds Accounts 8.52 Federal Reimbursements 8.53 Notice of Federal Audits 8.54 Enforce Recovery of Federal Funds for Statewide Indirect  Costs 8.75 Infrastructure Investment and Jobs Act 9.30 Federal Levy of State Funds 9.50 Minor Capital Outlay Projects 11.00 Information Technology Reporting Requirements 11.10 Reporting of Statewide Software License Agreements 11.11 Privacy of Information in Pay Stubs 11.93 Disaster Response-Emergency Operations Account  Reconciliation Adjustments 11.95 Federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 Home and  Community-Based Services Funding 11.96 Coronavirus Fiscal Relief 11.97 State Appropriation Limit Excludable Federal Fund  Appropriations for Capital Outlay 12.00 State Appropriations Limit (SAL) 12.30 Special Fund for Economic Uncertainties 12.32 Proposition 98-Funding Guarantee 12.35 Financial Aid Policy Change Requirements 12.45 June to July Payroll Deferral 13.00 Legislative Counsel Bureau 13.40 Budgetary Loan Borrowing from Special Funds 14.00 Special Fund Loans Between Boards of the Department of  Consumer Affairs 15.00 Proposition 4 Appropriations 15.14 Allocation of Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund 15.25 Data Center Rate Adjustment 15.45 Trial Court Funding Offsets 15.80 Reparations Legislation Funding 20.00 Reappropriations and Reversions 24.00 State School Fund Allocations 24.03 Reading Control 24.30 Transfer School Building Rental Income to the General  Fund 24.60 Report of Lottery Funds Received 24.70 Local Educational Agency Fiscal Accountability 25.40 Contracted Fiscal Services Costs 25.50 SCO Apportionment Payment System Assessments 26.00 Intraschedule Transfers 28.00 Program Change Notification 28.50 Agency Reimbursement Payments 29.00 Position Estimates of Governor’s Budget, May Revision,  and Final Change Book 30.00 Continuous Appropriations 31.00 Budget Act Administrative Procedures for Salaries and  Wages 32.00 Prohibits Excess Expenditures 33.00 Item Veto Severability 34.00 Constitutional Severability 35.21 Application of Net Final Payment Accrual Methodology 35.35 FI$Cal—​Short-Term Cash Loans 35.50 Estimated General Fund Revenues and Various Estimates  Related to the Budget Stabilization Account 38.00 Provides That This Bill Is a Budget Bill 39.00 Identification of Bills Related to the Budget Bill 39.10 List of Budget Act Statutes 90.00 Funding for Fire Response and Recovery 90.01 Additional Funding for Fire Response and Recovery 99.00 Alphabetical Organization Index 99.50 Numerical Control Section Index SEC. 30. This act is a Budget Bill within the meaning of subdivision (e) of Section 12 of Article IV of the California Constitution and shall take effect immediately.